Florida, session 2026, SB304.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 26 27 Section 1.âSubsection (3) is added to section 908.11, 28 Florida Statutes, to read: 29 908.11âImmigration enforcement assistance agreements; 30 reporting requirement.â 31 (3)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall impose a fine 32 of $10,000 for each violation of this section and shall use the 33 moneys collected from such fines to provide compensation to 34 victims harmed by unauthorized aliens pursuant to s. 908.14. 35 Section 2.âSection 908.14, Florida Statutes, is created to 36 read: 37 908.14âCompensation for victims of unauthorized aliens.â 38 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âunauthorized alienâ 39 has the same meaning as in s. 908.111. 40 (2)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall develop a 41 program to compensate residents who have suffered harm caused by 42 an unauthorized alien. 43 (3)âIn order to be eligible to receive compensation under 44 this section: 45 (a)âThe act or omission that caused the harm must have 46 occurred in this state on or after July 1, 2026; 47 (b)âThe preponderance of the evidence must show that an 48 unauthorized alien materially contributed to the harm for which 49 compensation is sought; and 50 (c)âThe person seeking compensation must complete a form 51 prescribed by the department. 52 (4)âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall adopt rules to 53 administer this section. 54 Section 3.âSection 908.15, Florida Statutes, is created to 55 read: 56 908.15âCause of action for wrongful death caused by an 57 unauthorized alien.â 58 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âunauthorized alienâ 59 has the same meaning as in s. 908.111. 60 (2)âThe estate of a person killed by an unauthorized alien 61 has a cause of action against: 62 (a)âA local governmental entity or law enforcement agency 63 that has a sanctuary policy in violation of s. 908.103. 64 (b)âA law enforcement agency in violation of s. 908.11 or 65 in violation of the agreement required under that section. 66 (3)âA plaintiff in such action must show by a preponderance 67 of the evidence that a failure to cooperate or comply fully with 68 federal immigration authorities or with an immigration detainer 69 materially contributed to an unauthorized alien causing the 70 decedentâs death. 71 (4)âNotwithstanding s. 768.28, and in accordance with s. 72 13, Art. X of the State Constitution, the state waives sovereign 73 immunity for liability for torts under this section. 74 Section 4.âSubsection (21) is added to section 768.28, 75 Florida Statutes, to read: 76 768.28âWaiver of sovereign immunity in tort actions; 77 recovery limits; civil liability for damages caused during a 78 riot; limitation on attorney fees; statute of limitations; 79 exclusions; indemnification; risk management programs.â 80 (21)âThis section does not apply to an action brought under 81 s. 908.15. 82 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.